Hawaii statutes.
§356D-23 Trustee; designation, duties.
(a) The authority may designate a trustee for each issue of bonds secured
under the same trust indenture; provided that the trustee shall be approved by
the director of finance.

(b) The trustee shall be authorized by the
authority to receive and receipt for, hold, and administer the proceeds of the
bonds, and to apply the proceeds to the purposes for which the bonds are
issued.

(c) The trustee shall also be authorized by
the authority to receive and receipt for, hold, and administer the revenues
derived by the authority from any public housing project or projects for which
the bonds are issued or the projects pledged to the payment of the bonds, and
to apply the revenues to the payment of the cost of administering, operating,
and maintaining the public housing project or projects, to pay the principal of
and the interest on the bonds, to the establishment of reserves, and to other
purposes as may be authorized in the proceedings providing for the issuance of
the bonds.

(d) Notwithstanding section 39-68, the
director of finance may appoint the trustee to serve as fiscal agent for:

(1) The payment of the principal of and interest on
the bonds; and

(2) The purchase, registration, transfer, exchange,
and redemption of the bonds.

(e) The trustee shall perform additional
functions with respect to the payment, purchase, registration, transfer,
exchange, and redemption, as the director of finance may deem necessary,
advisable, or expeditious, including the holding of the bonds and coupons, if
any, that have been paid and the supervision of their destruction in accordance
with law.

(f) Nothing in this part shall limit or be
construed to limit the powers granted to the director of finance in sections 36‑3,
39-13, and 39-68(a), to appoint the trustee or others as fiscal agents, paying
agents, and registrars for the bonds or to authorize and empower those fiscal
agents, paying agents, and registrars to perform the functions referred to in
those sections. [L 2006, c 180, pt of §2; am L 2016, c 42, §10]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next